Washington statutes.
RCW 18.235.130

Unprofessional conduct—Acts or conditions that constitute.

The following conduct, acts, or conditions constitute unprofessional conduct for any license holder or applicant under the jurisdiction of this chapter:

(1) The commission of any act involving moral turpitude, dishonesty, or corruption relating to the practice of the person's profession or operation of the person's business, whether the act constitutes a crime or not. At the disciplinary hearing a certified copy of a final holding of any court of competent jurisdiction is conclusive evidence of the conduct of the license holder or applicant upon which a conviction or the final holding is based. Upon a conviction, however, the judgment and sentence is conclusive evidence at the ensuing disciplinary hearing of the guilt of the license holder or applicant of the crime described in the indictment or information, and of the person's violation of the statute on which it is based. For the purposes of this subsection, conviction includes all instances in which a plea of guilty or nolo contendere is the basis for the conviction and all proceedings in which the sentence has been deferred or suspended. Except as specifically provided by law, nothing in this subsection abrogates the provisions of chapter 9.96A RCW. However, RCW 9.96A.020 does not apply to a person who is required to register as a sex offender under RCW 9A.44.130;

(2) Misrepresentation or concealment of a material fact in obtaining or renewing a license or in reinstatement thereof;

(3) Advertising that is false, deceptive, or misleading;

(4) Incompetence, negligence, or malpractice that results in harm or damage to another or that creates an unreasonable risk of harm or damage to another;

(5) The suspension, revocation, or restriction of a license to engage in any business or profession by competent authority in any state, federal, or foreign jurisdiction. A certified copy of the order, stipulation, or agreement is conclusive evidence of the revocation, suspension, or restriction;

(6) Failure to cooperate with the disciplinary authority in the course of an investigation, audit, or inspection authorized by law by:

(a) Not furnishing any papers or documents requested by the disciplinary authority;

(b) Not furnishing in writing an explanation covering the matter contained in a complaint when requested by the disciplinary authority;

(c) Not responding to a subpoena issued by the disciplinary authority, whether or not the recipient of the subpoena is the accused in the proceeding; or

(d) Not providing authorized access, during regular business hours, to representatives of the disciplinary authority conducting an investigation, inspection, or audit at facilities utilized by the license holder or applicant;

(7) Failure to comply with an order issued by the disciplinary authority;

(8) Violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the chapters specified in RCW 18.235.020(2) or any rules made by the disciplinary authority under the chapters specified in RCW 18.235.020(2);

(9) Aiding or abetting an unlicensed person to practice or operate a business or profession when a license is required;

(10) Practice or operation of a business or profession beyond the scope of practice or operation as defined by law or rule;

(11) Misrepresentation in any aspect of the conduct of the business or profession;

(12) Failure to adequately supervise or oversee auxiliary staff, whether employees or contractors, to the extent that consumers may be harmed or damaged;

(13) Conviction of any gross misdemeanor or felony relating to the practice of the person's profession or operation of the person's business. For the purposes of this subsection, conviction includes all instances in which a plea of guilty or nolo contendere is the basis for conviction and all proceedings in which the sentence has been deferred or suspended. Except as specifically provided by law, nothing in this subsection abrogates the provisions of chapter 9.96A RCW. However, RCW 9.96A.020 does not apply to a person who is required to register as a sex offender under RCW 9A.44.130;

(14) Interference with an investigation or disciplinary action by willful misrepresentation of facts before the disciplinary authority or its authorized representatives, or by the use of threats or harassment against any consumer or witness to discourage them from providing evidence in a disciplinary action or any other legal action, or by the use of financial inducements to any consumer or witness to prevent or attempt to prevent him or her from providing evidence in a disciplinary action; and

(15) Engaging in unlicensed practice as defined in RCW 18.235.010.

[ 2007 c 256 s 19; 2002 c 86 s 114.]